District of Columbia statutes.
5-131.02

Detail of federal officers.

The Secretary of the Interior is authorized in his discretion to detail officers and members of the United States Park Police force to participate in the activities of the band established by this subchapter, and the Secretary of the Treasury is authorized in his discretion to detail officers and members of the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division to participate in the activities of such band.

July 11, 1947, ch. 226, § 2
Aug. 16, 1971, 85 Stat. 343, Pub. L. 92-124,§ 1(2)
Nov. 15, 1977, 91 Stat. 1371, Pub. L. 95-179
Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.
This section is referenced in § 1-632.03.
1981 Ed., § 4-180.
1973 Ed., § 4-182a.